Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-2103
Hospital inpatient and outpatient services; assessments and directed-payment programs; establish; department; powers and duties.

(1) The department shall amend the medicaid state plan or file other federal authorizing documents to establish assessments and directed-payment programs for hospital inpatient and outpatient services.

(2) Upon approval by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of a hospital assessment and a directed-payment program, the department shall impose an assessment on hospitals to assure quality and access in the medical assistance program.

(3) The department may establish different assessment rates based on categories of hospital or hospital services as allowed by federal law.

(4) The department shall consult with a statewide association representing a majority of hospitals and health systems in Nebraska regarding the development, implementation, and annual renewal of the assessments and the directed-payment programs.

(5) The department shall partner with a statewide association representing a majority of hospitals and health systems in Nebraska to:

(a) Aggregate inpatient, outpatient, and clinic claims data in order to establish quality improvement metrics and track progress on identified metrics; and

(b) Design and implement quality initiatives to improve children's mental health, adult mental health, maternity care, and senior care.

(6) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that are necessary to implement the Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Act.

Laws 2024, LB1087, § 3.